Louisiana, session 2026, HB563.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:753.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§753.1. "Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List"; registration; reporting to NICS;
prohibitions on purchase or sale of firearms; confidentiality; penalties
A. This Section shall be referred to and may be cited as the "Louisiana
Voluntary Do Not Sell Firearms Act".
B.(1) A person may submit a form to the clerk of court in the parish of the
person's residence with a request to be added to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell
List and as a result shall be prohibited from receiving or possessing a firearm. The
clerk shall request a valid government-issued photo identification to verify the
person's identity prior to accepting the form. By the end of the business day when
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1329 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 563
the form was received, the clerk shall transmit the accepted form to the Department
of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police.
(2) A person may submit a form to any healthcare provider with a request
to be added to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List. The healthcare provider
shall verify the person's identity before accepting the form and may not accept a
form from someone other than the person named on the form. By the end of the
business day when the form was received, the provider shall electronically deliver
the person's completed form to the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
office of state police.
(3) A person may submit a form by mail to the office of state police with a
request to be added to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List. The form shall be
accompanied by a photocopy of a government-issued form of identification to verify
the person's identity prior to accepting the form.
(4) A person may submit a form by electronic mail, short message service,
or multimedia messaging service to the office of state police with a request to be
added to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List. The form shall be accompanied
by a copy of a government-issued photo identification and a photographic portrait
of the person that contains an exchangeable image file format data proving that the
photographic portrait was taken within one hour prior to transmission to the office
of state police.
C. The office of state police shall enter a person who requests to be added
to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List into the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System and other federal or state computer-based systems used
by law enforcement agencies to identify prohibited purchasers and possessors of
firearms within twenty-four hours of receipt of the form.
D.(1) No sooner than seven calendar days after submitting a form, a person
may submit a form with a request to be removed from the Louisiana Voluntary Do
Not Sell List by any of the methods provided in Subsection B of this Section. Unless
the person is otherwise prohibited from possessing or purchasing a firearm under
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1329 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 563
state or federal law, the office of state police shall do all of the following on the
twenty-first day after receipt of the request for removal:
(a) Remove the person and all of his information from the National Instant
Criminal Background Check System and any other federal or state computer-based
systems used by law enforcement to identify prohibited possessors and purchasers
of firearms where the information of the person was entered.
(b) Destroy all records related to the person being added and removed from
the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List.
(2) At any time, a person on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List may
file a signed expedited removal request form with the district court located in the
parish of the person's residence. There shall be no filing fees for such a request. The
court, within forty-eight hours of receipt of the request, shall hold a hearing after
adequate notice has been provided to the person. The court shall determine by a
preponderance of the evidence whether the request for removal is voluntary,
knowing, and intelligent. No later than twenty-four hours after the conclusion of the
hearing, the court shall inform the person of the court's determination. If the court
determines that the request for removal is voluntary, knowing, and intelligent, the
court shall instruct the office of state police to immediately remove the person from
the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List, unless the person is otherwise prohibited
from possessing or purchasing a firearm under state or federal law. If the court
determines that the request is not voluntary, knowing, and intelligent, the person may
request removal pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
E. A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding a person's
addition to or removal from the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List shall be
subject to criminal prosecution pursuant to R.S. 14:123.
F. A person's addition to, placement on, or removal from the Louisiana
Voluntary Do Not Sell List shall not be considered by any court in a legal proceeding
where the person executing the form is a party, unless the proceeding involves a
violation of R.S. 14:95.1.4(B)(2).
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1329 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 563
G. Records obtained and produced under this Section are confidential and
shall not be a public record, except that such information may be disclosed to any of
the following:
(1) A law enforcement officer acting in the performance of his official
duties.
(2) Either of the parties in the course of a criminal prosecution.
(3) A person requesting to be added to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell
List with respect to his own information.
H.(1) The office of state police shall develop the following electronic request
forms relative to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List:
(a) An addition form.
(b) A removal form.
(c) An expedited removal form.
(2) Each form shall contain the following:
(a) A signature line for the requesting person.
(b) A provision that states that the form is signed under penalty of perjury.
(c) All information necessary for identification and entry of the person into
the National Instant Criminal Background Check System to identify prohibited
possessors or purchasers of firearms.
(3) The forms shall be made available to the public on the website of the
office of state police, the Louisiana Department of Health, office of behavioral
health, and each judicial district court. The forms shall be electronically distributed
to all clerks of court and to all facilities where healthcare providers provide
healthcare or professional services related to healthcare within the scope of the
provider's license, certification, practice, education, or training.
(4) The office of state police shall ensure that the electronic form requesting
a person's addition to the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List provides an email
notification option that allows the requesting person to be added at the time of the
request or anytime after. The form shall also provide an option for one or more
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1329 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 563
email addresses of another person or persons to be notified by the office of state
police within twenty-four hours if the person on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell
List subsequently requests removal. The providing of an email address pursuant to
this Paragraph shall constitute an express authorization of the use of the email
address for the purposes of this Paragraph only.
(5) The office of state police may promulgate and adopt rules and
regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, as necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
I. Whoever coerces another person to add or remove his name from the
Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List shall be imprisoned with or without hard labor
for not more than one year.
J.(1) An insurer, as defined in R.S. 22:46, shall not inquire as to whether a
person is on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List. An insurer shall also not
modify the terms of any insurance policy of any individual due to that person's status
on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List or that person's request to be added to
or removed from the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List.
(2) An employer shall not inquire whether an employee or applicant is on the
Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List unless possession of a firearm is a requirement
of the employment position. An employer also shall not dismiss, discharge, demote,
deny employment, or otherwise alter the terms of employment of any employee or
applicant due to the employee or applicant being on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not
Sell List or having requested to be added to or removed from the Louisiana
Voluntary Do Not Sell List, unless possession of a firearm is a requirement of the
employment position.
(3)(a) A person may not conduct any unlawful discriminatory housing
practice as provided in R.S. 51:2606 against any person who is on the Louisiana
Voluntary Do Not Sell List or has requested to be added to or removed from the list.
(b) For purposes of this Subsection, it shall be a discriminatory housing
practice as provided in R.S. 51:2603(A)(6) if a person is subject to any act of
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1329 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 563
discrimination for being on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List or having
requested to be added to or removed from the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List.
(c) Whoever violates the provisions of this Paragraph shall be fined not more
than one hundred thousand dollars.
(4) The state, its agencies, or political subdivisions shall not condition or
alter any governmental benefits due to a person being on the Louisiana Voluntary Do
Not Sell List or having requested to be added to or removed from the Louisiana
Voluntary Do Not Sell List.
(5) A public educational institution shall not inquire as to whether an
individual is on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List unless it is acting as an
employer and is in compliance with Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(6) A healthcare provider shall not deny any service to an individual due to
that individual being on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List or having
requested to be added to or removed from the list.
(7) Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, whoever violates
the provisions of this Subsection shall be fined not more than forty thousand dollars.
Section 2. R.S. 14:95.1.4 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§95.1.4. Illegal transfer of a firearm to a prohibited possessor
A. Illegal transfer of a firearm to a prohibited possessor is the intentional
giving, selling, donating, lending, delivering, or otherwise transferring a firearm to
any person known to the offender to be a person prohibited from possessing a
firearm under state or federal law or a person whose name appears on the Louisiana
Voluntary Do Not Sell List.
B.(1) Whoever commits the crime of illegal transfer of a firearm to a
prohibited possessor shall be fined not more than two thousand five hundred dollars,
imprisoned with or without hard labor for not more than one year, or both.
(2) A person on the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List who knowingly
receives or possesses a firearm shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars or
sentenced to four hours of community service.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1329 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 563
Section 3. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(6) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(6) R.S. 13:753.1, 1905, 2593, 3715.3, 3715.4, 3734, 4687, 5108.1, 5304,
5366(L)
* * *
Section 4. Pursuant to R.S. 37:969, 1105, 1270, 2353, the Louisiana State Board of
Practical Nurse Examiners, the Louisiana Licensed Professional Counselors Board of
Examiners, the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners, and the Louisiana State Board
of Examiners of Psychologists shall adopt rules to encourage licensees to inform the public
about the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List. It shall be a non-binding best practice for
healthcare providers to explain the Louisiana Voluntary Do Not Sell List and to offer it as
an option to any recipient of their services whom the healthcare providers know has
attempted suicide or is at elevated risk of suicide for another reason or reasons.